inc/2toy-verbs-lexc.txt
!! first attempt to model simplest form of mohawk verbs:
!! personal prefix + root

!! we will start with only I, you and he 

! for a list and explanation of morphological tags see
!! http://giellatekno.uit.no/doc/lang/common/MorphologicalTags.html
!! extra tages are listed below
Multichar_Symbols  +AgentSg1 !! I-> X
+AgentSg2  !! you-> X
+AgentSg3Mal !! he -> X
+AgentSg3Fem !! she/smb/they -> X
+AgentSg3Neuter !! it -> X
+AgentDu21 !! you and I -> X
+AgentDu31 !! smb and I -> X
+AgentDu2 !! you two -> X
+AgentDu3 !! two males or mixed -> X
+AgentDu3Fem !! two females -> X
+AgentPl2Sg1 !! you all and I -> X
+AgentPl3Sg1 !! they all and I -> X
+AgentPl2 !! you all
+AgentPl3 !! they all (male or mixed) -> X
+AgentPl3Fem !! they all (female) -> X
+PatSg1 !! X -> I
+PatSg2  !!  X -> you
+PatSg3Mal !! X -> he 
+PatSg3Fem !! X -> she/smb/they 
+PatSg3Neuter !! X -> it 
+PatDu21 !! X -> you and I
+PatDu31 !! X -> smb and I 
+PatDu2 !! X -> you two 
+PatDu3 !! X -> two males or mixed 
+PatDu3Fem !! X -> two females
+PatPl2Sg1 !! X -> you all and I 
+PatPl3Sg1 !! X -> they all and I 
+PatPl2 !! X -> you all
+PatPl3 !! X -> they all (male or mixed) 
+PatPl3Fem !! X -> they all (female) 
!!! genders
+Mal 
+Fem 
+Neuter
+PronStart
+PronEnd 

Definitions
    rootStart = {<ROOT-->}; !! marker of the start of the root stem
    ppStart = {<PP-->}; !! marker of the beginning of the personal prefix


!! type of personal pronouns used (red, blue purple)
!!+Active+ 
!!+Passive+ 
!!+Relation+

LEXICON Root
V   ;


LEXICON V
<0:ppStart> SimplePresent ;

LEXICON SimplePresent
BoundPronounActive   ; !! red prefixes f
+AgentSg3Neuter:0 BoundPronounPassive  ; !! blue prefixes
 BoundPronounRelation   ; !! purple prefixes


!!------------------ ACTIVE VERBS (RED PREFIXES) --------------
LEXICON BoundPronounActive
+AgentSg1:ke EndActive   ;
+AgentSg2:se EndActive   ;
+AgentSg3Mal:ra EndActive   ;
+AgentSg3Fem:ye EndActive   ;
+AgentSg3Neuter:ka EndActive   ;
+AgentDu21:teni EndActive   ;
+AgentDu31:yakeni EndActive   ;
+AgentDu2:seni EndActive   ;
+AgentDu3:ni EndActive    ;
+AgentDu3Fem:keni EndActive   ;
+AgentPl2Sg1:tewa EndActive   ;
+AgentPl3Sg1:yakwa EndActive   ;
+AgentPl2:sewa EndActive   ;
+AgentPl3:rati EndActive   ;
+AgentPl3Fem:konti EndActive   ;

LEXICON EndActive
+PatSg3Neuter+:0 VerbStem   ; !! put a neutral patient for all active verbs

!!------------------ PASSIVE VERBS (BLUE PREFIXES) --------------
LEXICON BoundPronounPassive
+PatSg1:wake EndPassive   ;
+PatSg2:sa EndPassive   ;
+PatSg3Mal:ro EndPassive   ;
+PatSg3Fem:yako EndPassive   ;
+PatSg3Neuter:yo EndPassive   ; 
+PatDu21:yonkeni EndPassive   ;
+PatDu31:yonkeni EndPassive   ; 
+PatDu2:seni EndPassive   ; 
+PatDu3:roti EndPassive   ;
+PatDu3Fem:yoti EndPassive   ;
+PatPl2Sg1:yonkwa EndPassive   ;
+PatPl3Sg1:yonkwa EndPassive   ;
+PatPl2:sewa EndPassive   ;
+PatPl3:roti EndPassive   ;
+PatPl3Fem:yoti EndPassive   ;

LEXICON EndPassive
+:0 VerbStem   ; !! put a tag boundary marker to improve readability

!!------------------ RELATION OR TRANSITIVE VERBS (PURPLE PREFIXES) --------------
LEXICON BoundPronounRelation
+AgentSg1:0 RelationPronI   ;
+AgentSg2:0 RelationPronYou   ;

LEXICON RelationPronI
+PatSg2:kon EndRelation   ;
+PatSg3Mal:ri EndRelation   ;
+PatSg3Fem:khe EndRelation   ;


LEXICON RelationPronYou
+PatSg1:take EndRelation   ;
+PatSg3Mal:etshe EndRelation   ;
+PatSg3Fem:she EndRelation   ;


LEXICON EndRelation
+:0 VerbStem   ; !! put a tag boundary marker to improve readability


!! -----------------------VERBS ---------------------------------------

LEXICON VerbStem


<0:rootStart>   VerbRoots   ;


LEXICON VerbRoots

!! --------------some example c-stem verbs (verb stems starting with a constant)
!!nòn%:we's   #; !! to like
nòn:we's   #; !! to like
norónhkwa  #; !! to love

!! -------------verb stems starting with an "A"
atonhkárya’ks  #; !! to be hungry (page 131)
atera'swí:yo    #; !! to be lucky (page 131)
atketsko    #; !!to get up, brian's list, page 2


!! -------------verb stems starting with an "I"
í:tenht   #; !! to be  poor (page 132)
í:tahs #; !! to be sleeping
!! -------------verb stems starting with an "E" or "EN"
é:kahs #; !! to like the taste of something (page 131)
entórha #; !! lazy (page 131)
!! --------------verb stems starting with an "O" or "ON"
onni #; !! to make smth, Brian's list
on'wehskwen # ; !! to enjoy doing smth Brian's page 14
